Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4210
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Property Tax Credit Act is to provide property tax relief for property taxes levied against real property. The property tax relief will be made to owners of real property in the form of a property tax credit.

Laws 2007, LB367, § 2.